Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-10,110.01
Health and safety modifications, qualified zone academy, or American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 purpose bonds; refunding bonds; authorized; conditions.

(1) If a school board has issued or shall issue bonds pursuant to section 79-10,110 or 79-10,110.02 and such bonds or any part of such bonds are unpaid, are a legal liability against the school district governed by such school board, and are bearing interest, the school board may issue refunding bonds with which to call and redeem all or any part of such outstanding bonds at or before the date of maturity or the redemption date of such bonds. Such school board may include various series and issues of the outstanding bonds in a single issue of refunding bonds and may issue refunding bonds to pay any redemption premium and interest to accrue and become payable on the outstanding bonds being refunded. The refunding bonds may be issued and delivered at any time prior to the date of maturity or the redemption date of the bonds to be refunded that the school board determines to be in the best interests of the school district. The proceeds derived from the sale of the refunding bonds issued pursuant to this section may be invested in obligations of or guaranteed by the United States Government pending the time the proceeds are required for the purposes for which such refunding bonds were issued. To further secure the refunding bonds, the school board may enter into a contract with any bank or trust company within or without the state with respect to the safekeeping and application of the proceeds of the refunding bonds and the safekeeping and application of the earnings on the investment. All bonds issued under this section shall be redeemable at such times and under such conditions as the school board shall determine at the time of issuance.

(2) Any outstanding bonds or other evidences of indebtedness issued by a school board for which sufficient funds or obligations of or guaranteed by the United States Government have been pledged and set aside in safekeeping to be applied for the complete payment of such bonds or other evidences of indebtedness at maturity or upon redemption prior to maturity, interest thereon, and redemption premium, if any, shall not be considered as outstanding and unpaid.

(3) Each refunding bond issued under this section shall state on the bond (a) the object of its issue, (b) this section or the sections of the law under which such issue was made, including a statement that the issue is made in pursuance of such section or sections, and (c) the date and principal amount of the bond or bonds for which the refunding bonds are being issued.

(4) The refunding bonds shall be paid and the levy made and the tax collected for their payment in the same manner and under the same authorization for levy of taxes as applied for the bonds being refunded, in accordance with section 79-10,110 or 79-10,110.02.

Laws 2012, LB633, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB959, § 10.
April 19, 2016